Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 15 Alien Land [Repealed]

§§ 34-15-101 through 34-15-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter, which derived from Laws 1943, ch. 53, §§ 2 and 3, and Laws 1959, ch. 118, § 3, generally prohibited the acquisition or possession of land by nonresident aliens ineligible for citizenship.